Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Juvenile Delinquency.
Sec. 47.12.220.
Appointment of guardian or custodian.

When, in the course of a proceeding under this chapter, it appears to the court that the welfare of a minor will be promoted by the appointment of a guardian or custodian of the minor’s person or property, the court may make the appointment. The court shall have a summons issued and served upon the parents of the minor, if they can be found, in a manner and within a time before the hearing that the court considers reasonable. The court may determine whether the father, mother, or the department shall have the custody and control of the minor. If the minor is of sufficient age and intelligence to state desires, the court shall consider them. The court may order either or both parents to pay support for the minor’s care to the guardian, custodian, or department.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.12.230.
Support of minor.

When a delinquent minor is committed under this chapter, the court or the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

shall, after giving the parent a reasonable opportunity to be heard, require that the parent pay to the department in a manner that the court or the child support services agency directs a sum to cover in full or in part the maintenance and care of the minor. The support obligation shall be calculated under Rule 90.3(i) of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

If a parent wilfully fails or refuses to pay the sum fixed, the parent may be proceeded against as provided by law in cases of family desertion and nonsupport.

The sum collected from a parent under this section shall be directly credited to the general fund of the state.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 38 SLA 2008)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, inserted “or the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” and “or the child support services agency” in the first sentence of subsection (a), and substituted “require” for “adjudge” in that sentence.

Sec. 47.12.240.
Detention of minors.

When the court commits a minor to the custody of the department, the department shall arrange to place the minor in a juvenile detention facility or another suitable place that the department designates for that purpose. Except under the conditions described in AS

47.12.105

or (c) of this section, the minor may not be incarcerated in a correctional facility that houses adult prisoners.

When a minor is detained under this chapter, the person having responsibility for the facility in which the minor is detained shall immediately make reasonable attempts to notify the minor’s parent, guardian, or custodian of the minor’s detention.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a minor may be detained in an adult correctional facility, an adult jail, or a temporary secure juvenile holding area if the minor is arrested for criminal charges under AS

47.12.030(a)

, if the minor is the subject of a petition filed with the court under this chapter seeking adjudication of the minor as a delinquent minor, or if the minor is in official detention pending the filing of that petition; however, detention in an adult correctional facility, an adult jail, or a temporary secure juvenile holding area under this subsection may not exceed the lesser of

six hours, except under the criteria listed in (e) of this section; or

the time necessary to arrange the minor’s transportation to a juvenile detention facility or comparable facility for the detention of minors.

When a minor is detained under (c) of this section, the minor shall be

assigned to quarters in a correctional facility or an adult jail that are separate from quarters used to house adult prisoners so that the minor cannot communicate with or view adults who are in official detention;

provided admission, health care, hygiene, and food services and recreation and visitation opportunities separate from services and opportunities provided to adults who are in official detention.

Notwithstanding the limitation on detention set out in (c) of this section, a minor whose detention is authorized by (c) of this section may be detained in a correctional facility for up to 24 hours when the authority having jurisdiction over the minor under this chapter is outside a metropolitan statistical area under the current designation of the United States Bureau of the Census and the authority has no existing acceptable alternative placement available for the minor. The minor may be held in secure custody beyond the 24-hour period if the criteria set out in this subsection are met and if the correctional facility is located where conditions of

distance to be traveled or the lack of highway, road, or other ground transportation do not allow for court appearances within 24 hours, in which case the minor may be held for up to an additional 48 hours at the correctional facility; or

lack of safety exist, such as severely adverse, life-threatening weather conditions that do not allow for reasonably safe travel, in which case the time for an appearance may be delayed until 24 hours after the time that the conditions become safe.

A detention authorized by (e) of this section may not exceed the time necessary to satisfy the requirement of (c)(2) of this section.

[Repealed, § 42 ch 12 SLA 2006.]

In this section,

“correctional facility” has the meaning given in AS

33.30.901

whether the facility is operated by the state, a municipality, a village, or another entity;

“official detention” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 30 ch 107 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 79 SLA 2001; am §§ 1, 2 ch 95 SLA 2004; am § 42 ch 12 SLA 2006; am §§ 31 — 35 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For admission to juvenile correctional facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective June 26, 2004, deleted former paragraph (c)(3), relating to protective custody detention of a minor, and made related changes.

The 2006 amendment, effective April 4, 2006, repealed subsection (g).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “juvenile detention facility” for “detention home, work camp,” following “place the minor in a”, in the second sentence, substituted “under the conditions described in AS

47.12.105

or” for “when detention in a correctional facility is authorized by” near the beginning; rewrote (c); in (d), rewrote the introductory language, which read, “When a minor is detained under (c)(1) of this section and incarcerated in a correctional facility, the minor shall be”, in (d)(1), inserted “or an adult jail” following “correctional facility”, and made a stylistic change; in (e), in the introductory language, twice substituted “(c)” for (c)(1)”;
in (f), substituted (c)(2) for (c)(1)(B) near the end.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 95, SLA 2004 (SB 340), proposing legislation conforming the state’s juvenile detention laws with federal requirements set out in the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 2003, see 2004 Senate Journal 2185.

Sec. 47.12.245.
Arrest.

A peace officer may

arrest a minor

for the commission of an act that subjects the minor to the provisions of this chapter under the same circumstances and in the same manner as would apply to the arrest of an adult for violation of a criminal law of the state or a municipality of the state;

if the peace officer reasonably believes the minor is a fugitive from justice;

if the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the minor has violated a condition of the minor’s release or probation; or

if the peace officer reasonably believes that the minor has been adjudicated a delinquent and has escaped from an institution or absconded from probation, parole, or the jurisdiction of a court;

continue the lawful arrest of a minor that is made by a citizen.

A juvenile probation officer may arrest a minor if the juvenile probation officer has probable cause to believe that the minor has violated the minor’s conditions of conduct or probation.

History.

(§ 31 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 36 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (b), twice inserted “juvenile” preceding “probation officer” and substituted “violated the minor’s conditions of conduct or probation” for “violated conditions of the minor’s release or probation”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57, ch. 107, SLA 1998 provides that this section applies “to all offenses committed on or after July 1, 1998.”

Sec. 47.12.250.
Temporary detention and detention hearing.

A peace officer or a juvenile probation officer who has arrested, or a peace officer who has continued the arrest of, a minor under AS

47.12.245

or a minor for criminal charges under AS

47.12.030

may

have the minor detained in a juvenile detention facility or temporary secure juvenile holding area if, in the opinion of the officer making or continuing the arrest, it is necessary to do so to protect the minor or the community; however, the department may direct that a minor subject to delinquency proceedings who was arrested or whose arrest was continued be released from detention before the hearing required by (c) of this section;

before taking the minor to a juvenile detention facility or temporary secure juvenile holding area, release the minor to the minor’s parents or guardian if detention is not necessary to

protect the minor or the community; or

ensure the minor’s attendance at subsequent court hearings.

A peace officer who has a minor detained under (a) of this section shall immediately, and in no event more than 12 hours later, notify the court and make reasonable efforts to notify the minor’s parents or guardian, the minor’s foster parent, and the department of the officer’s action. The department may file with the court a petition alleging delinquency before the detention hearing.

The court shall immediately, and in no event more than 48 hours later, hold a hearing at which the minor and the minor’s parents or guardian if they can be found shall be present. For those minors held securely in correctional facilities that house adult prisoners, the court shall immediately, and in no event more than 24 hours after the custody begins, hold a hearing at which the minor and the minor’s parents or guardian if they can be found shall be present. The court shall determine whether probable cause exists for believing the minor to be delinquent. The court shall inform the minor of the reasons alleged to constitute probable cause and the reasons alleged to authorize the minor’s detention. The minor is entitled to counsel. The court shall give the minor’s foster parent the opportunity to be heard at the hearing.

If the court finds that probable cause exists, it shall determine whether the minor should be detained pending the hearing on the petition or released. It may either order the minor held in detention or released to the custody of a suitable person pending the hearing on the petition. If the court finds no probable cause, it shall order the minor released and close the case.

Except for temporary detention pending a detention hearing, a minor may be detained only by court order.

A minor arrested for criminal charges under AS

47.12.030

is subject to adult court proceedings and shall be held in a juvenile detention facility under AS

47.12.105

. A minor arrested under this section may be temporarily held in an adult correctional facility or temporary secure juvenile holding area under the conditions set out in AS

47.12.240(c)

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am §§ 32, 33 ch 107 SLA 1998; am §§ 7, 8 ch 40 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 79 SLA 2001; am §§ 37, 38 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For effect of the amendments made by §§ 7 and 8, ch. 40, SLA 1999 on the Alaska Delinquency Rules, see § 10, ch. 40, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

For effect of the amendment to (c) of this section by § 3, ch. 79, SLA 2001 on Rule 12, Alaska Delinquency Rules, see § 4, ch. 79, SLA 2001 the 2001 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For juvenile detention facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (a), in the introductory language, inserted “juvenile” preceding “probation officer”, and “or a minor for criminal charges under AS

47.12.030

” following “AS

47.12.245

”, and made a stylistic change, in (a)(1), inserted “or temporary secure juvenile holding area” following “juvenile detention facility”, deleted “peace” preceding “officer”, inserted “subject to delinquency proceedings” following “direct that a minor” and made a stylistic change, in (a)(2), inserted “or temporary secure juvenile holding area” following “juvenile detention facility”; added (f).

Sec. 47.12.255.
Placement in secure residential psychiatric treatment centers.

The court may authorize the department to place a minor who is in the custody of the department under AS

47.12.120(b)(1)

or (3) or

47.12.140

in a secure residential psychiatric treatment center if the court finds, based on the testimony of a mental health professional, that

the minor is gravely disabled or is suffering from mental illness and, as a result, is likely to cause serious harm to the minor or to another person;

there is no reasonably available, appropriate, and less restrictive alternative for the minor’s treatment or that less restrictive alternatives have been tried and have failed; and

there is reason to believe that the minor’s mental condition could be improved by the course of treatment or would deteriorate if untreated.

A court shall review a placement made under this section at least once every 90 days. The court may authorize the department to continue the placement of the minor in a secure residential psychiatric treatment center if the court finds, based on the testimony of a mental health professional, that the conditions or symptoms that resulted in the initial order have not ameliorated to such an extent that the minor’s needs can be met in a less restrictive setting and that the minor’s mental condition could be improved by the course of treatment or would deteriorate if untreated.

The department shall transfer a minor from a secure residential psychiatric treatment center to another appropriate placement if the mental health professional responsible for the minor’s treatment determines that the minor would no longer benefit from the course of treatment or that the minor’s treatment needs could be met in a less restrictive setting. The department shall notify the minor, the minor’s parents or guardian, and the minor’s guardian ad litem of a determination and transfer made under this subsection.

In this section, “likely to cause serious harm” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

.

History.

(§ 34 ch 107 SLA 1998)

Sec. 47.12.260.
Releasing minors after commitment.

A minor found to be a juvenile delinquent who by conduct gives sufficient evidence of having reformed may be released at any time under the conditions and regulations that the department considers proper, if it appears to the satisfaction of the department that there is a reasonable probability that the minor will remain at liberty without violating the law.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For program and treatment, see 7 AAC 52, art. 4.

Sec. 47.12.270.
Juvenile probation officers.

The department shall employ juvenile probation officers. A juvenile probation officer shall exercise the duties of a probation officer and shall prepare preliminary investigations and assist and advise the court in the furtherance of the welfare and control of a minor under the court’s jurisdiction. A juvenile probation officer shall also carry out other duties in the care and treatment of minors that are consistent with the intent of this chapter.

A juvenile probation officer has the powers of a peace officer with respect to the service of process and arresting a minor when

a court has issued an arrest warrant;

there is probable cause to believe the minor has violated conditions of conduct or probation; or

probable cause exists for believing that the minor has escaped from or unlawfully evaded a placement made under AS

47.12.120(b)(1)

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 39 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, rewrote the section.